src/Korektor/sr.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1644 Y 28
SFX 1644 сути сути
SFX 1644 сути спем
SFX 1644 сути спеш
SFX 1644 сути спе
SFX 1644 сути спемо
SFX 1644 сути спете
SFX 1644 сути спу
SFX 1644 сути суо
SFX 1644 сути сула
SFX 1644 сути суло
SFX 1644 сути сули
SFX 1644 сути суле
SFX 1644 сути сућу
SFX 1644 сути сућеш
SFX 1644 сути суће
SFX 1644 сути сућемо
SFX 1644 сути сућете
SFX 1644 сути суће
SFX 1644 сути спи
SFX 1644 сути спимо
SFX 1644 сути спите
SFX 1644 сути сух
SFX 1644 сути су
SFX 1644 сути суше
SFX 1644 сути сусмо
SFX 1644 сути сусте
SFX 1644 сути шахуаху
SFX 1644 сути сувши

SFX 1645 Y 28
SFX 1645 њети њети
SFX 1645 њети ним
SFX 1645 њети ниш
SFX 1645 њети ни
SFX 1645 њети нимо
SFX 1645 њети ните
SFX 1645 њети не
SFX 1645 њети нио
SFX 1645 њети њела
SFX 1645 њети њело
SFX 1645 њети њели
SFX 1645 њети њеле
SFX 1645 њети њећу
SFX 1645 њети њећеш
SFX 1645 њети њеће
SFX 1645 њети њећемо
SFX 1645 њети њећете
SFX 1645 њети њеће
SFX 1645 њети ни
SFX 1645 њети нимо
SFX 1645 њети ните
SFX 1645 њети њех
SFX 1645 њети ње
SFX 1645 њети њеше
SFX 1645 њети њесмо
SFX 1645 њети њесте
SFX 1645 њети њаху
SFX 1645 њети њевши

SFX 1646 Y 27
SFX 1646 сати шути
SFX 1646 сати сам
SFX 1646 сати саш
SFX 1646 сати са
SFX 1646 сати само
SFX 1646 сати сате
SFX 1646 сати сају
SFX 1646 сати сао
SFX 1646 сати сала
SFX 1646 сати сало
SFX 1646 сати сали
SFX 1646 сати сале
SFX 1646 сати саћу
SFX 1646 сати саћеш
SFX 1646 сати саће
SFX 1646 сати саћемо
SFX 1646 сати саћете
SFX 1646 сати саће
SFX 1646 сати сај
SFX 1646 сати сајмо
SFX 1646 сати сајте
SFX 1646 сати сах
SFX 1646 сати саше
SFX 1646 сати сасмо
SFX 1646 сати састе
SFX 1646 сати саху
SFX 1646 сати сајући

SFX 1647 Y 28
SFX 1647 атрти атрти
SFX 1647 атрти атрем
SFX 1647 атрти атреш
SFX 1647 атрти атре
SFX 1647 атрти атремо
SFX 1647 атрти атрете
SFX 1647 атрти атру
SFX 1647 атрти атро
SFX 1647 атрти атрла
SFX 1647 атрти атрло
SFX 1647 атрти атрли
SFX 1647 атрти атрле
SFX 1647 атрти атрћу
SFX 1647 атрти атрћеш
SFX 1647 атрти атрће
SFX 1647 атрти атрћемо
SFX 1647 атрти атрћете
SFX 1647 атрти атрће
SFX 1647 атрти атри
SFX 1647 атрти атримо
SFX 1647 атрти атрите
SFX 1647 атрти атрех
SFX 1647 атрти атре
SFX 1647 атрти атерше
SFX 1647 атрти атресмо
SFX 1647 атрти атресте
SFX 1647 атрти треху
SFX 1647 атрти атрвши

SFX 1648 Y 28
SFX 1648 ћи ћи
SFX 1648 ћи чем
SFX 1648 ћи чеш
SFX 1648 ћи че
SFX 1648 ћи чемо
SFX 1648 ћи чете
SFX 1648 ћи ку
SFX 1648 ћи као
SFX 1648 ћи кла
SFX 1648 ћи кло
SFX 1648 ћи кли
SFX 1648 ћи кле
SFX 1648 ћи кнућу
SFX 1648 ћи кнућеш
SFX 1648 ћи кнуће
SFX 1648 ћи кнућемо
SFX 1648 ћи кнућете
SFX 1648 ћи кнуће
SFX 1648 ћи ци
SFX 1648 ћи цимо
SFX 1648 ћи ците
SFX 1648 ћи кох
SFX 1648 ћи че
SFX 1648 ћи коше
SFX 1648 ћи космо
SFX 1648 ћи косте
SFX 1648 ћи каху
SFX 1648 ћи кавши

SFX 1649 Y 28
SFX 1649 ети ети
SFX 1649 ети мем
SFX 1649 ети меш
SFX 1649 ети ме
SFX 1649 ети мемо
SFX 1649 ети мете
SFX 1649 ети му
SFX 1649 ети ео
SFX 1649 ети ела
SFX 1649 ети ело
SFX 1649 ети ели
SFX 1649 ети еле
SFX 1649 ети ећу
SFX 1649 ети ећеш
SFX 1649 ети еће
SFX 1649 ети ећемо
SFX 1649 ети ећете
SFX 1649 ети еће
SFX 1649 ети ми
SFX 1649 ети мимо
SFX 1649 ети мите
SFX 1649 ети ех
SFX 1649 ети е
SFX 1649 ети еше
SFX 1649 ети есмо
SFX 1649 ети есте
SFX 1649 ети еху
SFX 1649 ети евши

SFX 1650 Y 28
SFX 1650 злати злати
SFX 1650 злати злам
SFX 1650 злати злаш
SFX 1650 злати зла
SFX 1650 злати зламо
SFX 1650 злати злате
SFX 1650 злати злају
SFX 1650 злати злао
SFX 1650 злати злала
SFX 1650 злати злало
SFX 1650 злати злали
SFX 1650 злати злале
SFX 1650 злати злаћу
SFX 1650 злати злаћеш
SFX 1650 злати злаће
SFX 1650 злати злаћемо
SFX 1650 злати злаћете
SFX 1650 злати злаће
SFX 1650 злати злај
SFX 1650 злати злајмо
SFX 1650 злати злајте
SFX 1650 злати злах
SFX 1650 злати зла
SFX 1650 злати злаше
SFX 1650 злати зласмо
SFX 1650 злати зласте
SFX 1650 злати жљаху
SFX 1650 злати злавши

SFX 1651 Y 36
SFX 1651 кати кати
SFX 1651 кати чеш
SFX 1651 кати че
SFX 1651 кати чемо
SFX 1651 кати чете
SFX 1651 кати чу
SFX 1651 кати кам
SFX 1651 кати каш
SFX 1651 кати ка
SFX 1651 кати камо
SFX 1651 кати кате
SFX 1651 кати кају
SFX 1651 кати као
SFX 1651 кати кала
SFX 1651 кати кало
SFX 1651 кати кали
SFX 1651 кати кале
SFX 1651 кати каћу
SFX 1651 кати каћеш
SFX 1651 кати каће
SFX 1651 кати каћемо
SFX 1651 кати каћете
SFX 1651 кати каће
SFX 1651 кати чи
SFX 1651 кати чимо
SFX 1651 кати чите
SFX 1651 кати кај
SFX 1651 кати кајмо
SFX 1651 кати кајте
SFX 1651 кати ках
SFX 1651 кати ка
SFX 1651 кати каше
SFX 1651 кати касмо
SFX 1651 кати касте
SFX 1651 кати каху
SFX 1651 кати кавши

SFX 1652 Y 28
SFX 1652 ети ети
SFX 1652 ети ем
SFX 1652 ети еш
SFX 1652 ети е
SFX 1652 ети емо
SFX 1652 ети ете
SFX 1652 ети еју
SFX 1652 ети ео
SFX 1652 ети ела
SFX 1652 ети ело
SFX 1652 ети ели
SFX 1652 ети еле
SFX 1652 ети ећу
SFX 1652 ети ећеш
SFX 1652 ети еће
SFX 1652 ети ећемо
SFX 1652 ети ећете
SFX 1652 ети еће
SFX 1652 ети еј
SFX 1652 ети ејмо
SFX 1652 ети ејте
SFX 1652 ети ех
SFX 1652 ети е
SFX 1652 ети еше
SFX 1652 ети есмо
SFX 1652 ети есте
SFX 1652 ети еху
SFX 1652 ети евши

SFX 1653 Y 28
SFX 1653 ети ети
SFX 1653 ети им
SFX 1653 ети иш
SFX 1653 ети и
SFX 1653 ети имо
SFX 1653 ети ите
SFX 1653 ети е
SFX 1653 ети ео
SFX 1653 ети ела
SFX 1653 ети ело
SFX 1653 ети ели
SFX 1653 ети еле
SFX 1653 ети ећу
SFX 1653 ети ећеш
SFX 1653 ети еће
SFX 1653 ети ећемо
SFX 1653 ети ећете
SFX 1653 ети еће
SFX 1653 ети и
SFX 1653 ети имо
SFX 1653 ети ите
SFX 1653 ети ех
SFX 1653 ети е
SFX 1653 ети еше
SFX 1653 ети есмо
SFX 1653 ети есте
SFX 1653 ети еху
SFX 1653 ети евши

SFX 1654 Y 28
SFX 1654 ћи ти
SFX 1654 ћи гнем
SFX 1654 ћи гнеш
SFX 1654 ћи гне
SFX 1654 ћи гнемо
SFX 1654 ћи гнете
SFX 1654 ћи гну
SFX 1654 ћи гао
SFX 1654 ћи гла
SFX 1654 ћи гло
SFX 1654 ћи гли
SFX 1654 ћи гле
SFX 1654 ћи гнућу
SFX 1654 ћи гнућеш
SFX 1654 ћи гнуће
SFX 1654 ћи гнућемо
SFX 1654 ћи гнућете
SFX 1654 ћи гнуће
SFX 1654 ћи гни
SFX 1654 ћи гнимо
SFX 1654 ћи гните
SFX 1654 ћи гох
SFX 1654 ћи же
SFX 1654 ћи гоше
SFX 1654 ћи госмо
SFX 1654 ћи госте
SFX 1654 ћи жаху
SFX 1654 ћи гавши

SFX 1655 Y 34
SFX 1655 бити бити
SFX 1655 бити бијем
SFX 1655 бити бијеш
SFX 1655 бити бије
SFX 1655 бити бијемо
SFX 1655 бити бијете
SFX 1655 бити удем
SFX 1655 бити удеш
SFX 1655 бити уде
SFX 1655 бити удемо
SFX 1655 бити удете
SFX 1655 бити уду
SFX 1655 бити бију
SFX 1655 бити био
SFX 1655 бити била
SFX 1655 бити било
SFX 1655 бити били
SFX 1655 бити биле
SFX 1655 бити бићу
SFX 1655 бити бићеш
SFX 1655 бити биће
SFX 1655 бити бићемо
SFX 1655 бити бићете
SFX 1655 бити биће
SFX 1655 бити биј
SFX 1655 бити бијмо
SFX 1655 бити бијте
SFX 1655 бити бих
SFX 1655 бити би
SFX 1655 бити бише
SFX 1655 бити бисмо
SFX 1655 бити бисте
SFX 1655 бити баху
SFX 1655 бити бивши

SFX 1656 Y 27
SFX 1656 вати вати
SFX 1656 вати овем
SFX 1656 вати овеш
SFX 1656 вати ове
SFX 1656 вати овемо
SFX 1656 вати овете
SFX 1656 вати ову
SFX 1656 вати вао
SFX 1656 вати вала
SFX 1656 вати вало
SFX 1656 вати вали
SFX 1656 вати вале
SFX 1656 вати ваћу
SFX 1656 вати ваћеш
SFX 1656 вати ваће
SFX 1656 вати ваћемо
SFX 1656 вати ваћете
SFX 1656 вати ваће
SFX 1656 вати ови
SFX 1656 вати овимо
SFX 1656 вати овите
SFX 1656 вати вах
SFX 1656 вати ваше
SFX 1656 вати васмо
SFX 1656 вати васте
SFX 1656 вати ваху
SFX 1656 вати вајући

SFX 1657 Y 27
SFX 1657 ати ати
SFX 1657 ати им
SFX 1657 ати иш
SFX 1657 ати и
SFX 1657 ати имо
SFX 1657 ати ите
SFX 1657 ати е
SFX 1657 ати ао
SFX 1657 ати ала
SFX 1657 ати ало
SFX 1657 ати али
SFX 1657 ати але
SFX 1657 ати аћу
SFX 1657 ати аћеш
SFX 1657 ати аће
SFX 1657 ати аћемо
SFX 1657 ати аћете
SFX 1657 ати аће
SFX 1657 ати и
SFX 1657 ати аио
SFX 1657 ати ите
SFX 1657 ати ах
SFX 1657 ати аше
SFX 1657 ати асмо
SFX 1657 ати асте
SFX 1657 ати аху
SFX 1657 ати ећи

SFX 1658 Y 28
SFX 1658 ити ити
SFX 1658 ити им
SFX 1658 ити иш
SFX 1658 ити и
SFX 1658 ити имо
SFX 1658 ити ите
SFX 1658 ити е
SFX 1658 ити ио
SFX 1658 ити ила
SFX 1658 ити ило
SFX 1658 ити или
SFX 1658 ити иле
SFX 1658 ити ићу
SFX 1658 ити ићеш
SFX 1658 ити иће
SFX 1658 ити ићемо
SFX 1658 ити ићете
SFX 1658 ити иће
SFX 1658 ити и
SFX 1658 ити имо
SFX 1658 ити ите
SFX 1658 ити их
SFX 1658 ити и
SFX 1658 ити ише
SFX 1658 ити исмо
SFX 1658 ити исте
SFX 1658 ити њаху
SFX 1658 ити ивши

SFX 1659 Y 28
SFX 1659 ти ти
SFX 1659 ти нем
SFX 1659 ти неш
SFX 1659 ти не
SFX 1659 ти немо
SFX 1659 ти нете
SFX 1659 ти ну
SFX 1659 ти о
SFX 1659 ти ла
SFX 1659 ти ло
SFX 1659 ти ли
SFX 1659 ти ле
SFX 1659 ти нућу
SFX 1659 ти нућеш
SFX 1659 ти нуће
SFX 1659 ти нућемо
SFX 1659 ти нућете
SFX 1659 ти нуће
SFX 1659 ти ни
SFX 1659 ти нимо
SFX 1659 ти ните
SFX 1659 ти нух
SFX 1659 ти ну
SFX 1659 ти нуше
SFX 1659 ти нусмо
SFX 1659 ти нусте
SFX 1659 ти ху
SFX 1659 ти нувши

SFX 1660 Y 27
SFX 1660 њети њети
SFX 1660 њети ним
SFX 1660 њети ниш
SFX 1660 њети ни
SFX 1660 њети нимо
SFX 1660 њети ните
SFX 1660 њети не
SFX 1660 њети нио
SFX 1660 њети њела
SFX 1660 њети њело
SFX 1660 њети њели
SFX 1660 њети њеле
SFX 1660 њети њећу
SFX 1660 њети њећеш
SFX 1660 њети њеће
SFX 1660 њети њећемо
SFX 1660 њети њећете
SFX 1660 њети њеће
SFX 1660 њети ни
SFX 1660 њети нимо
SFX 1660 њети ните
SFX 1660 њети њех
SFX 1660 њети њеше
SFX 1660 њети њесмо
SFX 1660 њети њесте
SFX 1660 њети њеху
SFX 1660 њети њећи

SFX 1661 Y 28
SFX 1661 сати сати
SFX 1661 сати шем
SFX 1661 сати шеш
SFX 1661 сати ше
SFX 1661 сати шемо
SFX 1661 сати шете
SFX 1661 сати шу
SFX 1661 сати сао
SFX 1661 сати сала
SFX 1661 сати сало
SFX 1661 сати сали
SFX 1661 сати сале
SFX 1661 сати саћу
SFX 1661 сати саћеш
SFX 1661 сати саће
SFX 1661 сати саћемо
SFX 1661 сати саћете
SFX 1661 сати саће
SFX 1661 сати ши
SFX 1661 сати шимо
SFX 1661 сати шите
SFX 1661 сати сах
SFX 1661 сати са
SFX 1661 сати саше
SFX 1661 сати сасмо
SFX 1661 сати састе
SFX 1661 сати шаху
SFX 1661 сати савши

SFX 1662 Y 28
SFX 1662 псти псти
SFX 1662 псти бем
SFX 1662 псти беш
SFX 1662 псти бе
SFX 1662 псти бемо
SFX 1662 псти бете
SFX 1662 псти бу
SFX 1662 псти бао
SFX 1662 псти бла
SFX 1662 псти бло
SFX 1662 псти бли
SFX 1662 псти бле
SFX 1662 псти пшћу
SFX 1662 псти пшћеш
SFX 1662 псти пшће
SFX 1662 псти пшћемо
SFX 1662 псти пшћете
SFX 1662 псти пшће
SFX 1662 псти би
SFX 1662 псти бимо
SFX 1662 псти бите
SFX 1662 псти бох
SFX 1662 псти бе
SFX 1662 псти боше
SFX 1662 псти босмо
SFX 1662 псти босте
SFX 1662 псти баху
SFX 1662 псти бајући

SFX 1663 Y 27
SFX 1663 ати ати
SFX 1663 ати ам
SFX 1663 ати аш
SFX 1663 ати а
SFX 1663 ати амо
SFX 1663 ати ате
SFX 1663 ати аје
SFX 1663 ати ао
SFX 1663 ати ала
SFX 1663 ати ало
SFX 1663 ати али
SFX 1663 ати але
SFX 1663 ати аћу
SFX 1663 ати аћеш
SFX 1663 ати аће
SFX 1663 ати аћемо
SFX 1663 ати аћете
SFX 1663 ати аће
SFX 1663 ати а
SFX 1663 ати амо
SFX 1663 ати ате
SFX 1663 ати ах
SFX 1663 ати аше
SFX 1663 ати асмо
SFX 1663 ати асте
SFX 1663 ати аху
SFX 1663 ати ајећи

SFX 1664 Y 28
SFX 1664 ебити ебити
SFX 1664 ебити ебим
SFX 1664 ебити ебиш
SFX 1664 ебити еби
SFX 1664 ебити ебимо
SFX 1664 ебити ебите
SFX 1664 ебити ебе
SFX 1664 ебити ебио
SFX 1664 ебити ебила
SFX 1664 ебити ебило
SFX 1664 ебити ебили
SFX 1664 ебити ебиле
SFX 1664 ебити ебићу
SFX 1664 ебити ебићеш
SFX 1664 ебити ебиће
SFX 1664 ебити ебићемо
SFX 1664 ебити ебићете
SFX 1664 ебити ебиће
SFX 1664 ебити еби
SFX 1664 ебити ебимо
SFX 1664 ебити ебите
SFX 1664 ебити ебих
SFX 1664 ебити еби
SFX 1664 ебити ебише
SFX 1664 ебити ебисмо
SFX 1664 ебити ебисте
SFX 1664 ебити абљаху
SFX 1664 ебити ебивши

SFX 1665 Y 33
SFX 1665 ати ати
SFX 1665 ати ам
SFX 1665 ати аш
SFX 1665 ати а
SFX 1665 ати амо
SFX 1665 ати ате
SFX 1665 ати ају
SFX 1665 ати ао
SFX 1665 ати ала
SFX 1665 ати ало
SFX 1665 ати али
SFX 1665 ати але
SFX 1665 ати аћу
SFX 1665 ати аћеш
SFX 1665 ати аће
SFX 1665 ати аћемо
SFX 1665 ати аћете
SFX 1665 ати аће
SFX 1665 ати ај
SFX 1665 ати ајмо
SFX 1665 ати ајте
SFX 1665 ати ах
SFX 1665 ати аде
SFX 1665 ати аше
SFX 1665 ати асмо
SFX 1665 ати асте
SFX 1665 ати адох
SFX 1665 ати аде
SFX 1665 ати адоше
SFX 1665 ати адосмо
SFX 1665 ати адосте
SFX 1665 ати аху
SFX 1665 ати ајући
